Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8361.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Legislative findings and purpose.
(1) The general assembly finds that:
(i) Tow truck operators perform essential public safety services on the highways of this
state.
(ii) The towing industry operates in hazardous roadside conditions requiring standardized
safety training.
(iii) The current tariff modification process lacks statutory timelines and shared regulatory
accountability.
(iv) Public safety, consumer protection, and economic sustainability require modernization
of regulatory oversight.
(2) The purpose of this chapter is to:
(i) Establish mandatory tow operator licensing standards;
(ii) Create a Rhode Island towing advisory board as a public body;
(iii) Establish a consulting relationship between the division of public utilities and carriers
and the Rhode Island towing advisory board;
(iv) Mandate transparent and timely tariff modification procedures;
(v) Strengthen enforcement against unlicensed towing operations.
SECTION 2. Title 39 of the General Laws entitled "PUBLIC UTILITIES AND

CARRIERS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 12.2
RHODE ISLAND TOWING INDUSTRY MODERNIZATION AND REGULATORY ACT
39-12.2-1. Tow operator licensing requirement.
(a) No individual shall operate a tow truck within the state unless:
(1) The operator possesses a certificate of public convenience issued by the administrator
of the division of public utilities and carriers ("DPUC").
(2) The operator of the tow vehicle is properly licensed, to include a commercial driver's
license, if applicable, for the operation of the tow vehicle.
(3) The division of public utilities and carriers, in consultation with the Rhode Island
towing advisory board pursuant to § 39-12.2-3, shall promulgate regulations establishing minimum
training standards and annual continuing education requirements of not less than eight (8) hours.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting any municipality from
establishing or enforcing rules of operation for tow truck operators not inconsistent with the
provisions of this chapter and the rules and regulations promulgated by the DPUC for operation of
tow trucks within the municipality's jurisdiction.
39-12.2-2. Establishment of Rhode Island towing advisory board.
(a) There is hereby established the Rhode Island towing advisory board ("advisory board").
(b) The advisory board shall consist of six (6) members:
(1) Two (2) representatives appointed by the Rhode Island public towing association;
(2) One representative of the division of public utilities and carriers appointed by the
administrator of the department;
(3) One representative of the department of transportation appointed by the department's
director;
(4) One representative of the Rhode Island state police appointed by the director of public
safety, who shall serve as chairperson; and
(5) One public member appointed by the governor.
(c) Members of the board shall receive no compensation for their service.
(d) The board shall meet at least annually at the call of the chairperson.
(e) The board shall have the following duties:
(1) Provide advice and recommendations to the DPUC regarding:
(i) Tariff rate approvals and modifications;
(ii) Licensing standards;
(iii) Enforcement policies;
LC006121 - Page 2 of 4

(iv) Training, safety, tooling and technology standards; and
(v) Other matters as requested by the DPUC.
(2) Assist the DPUC in providing transparency and information to the public regarding
licensed tow operations and authorized tariff rates.
(f) Vacancies on the board shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.
(g) A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum.
39-12.2-3. Rules and regulations.
(a) The DPUC shall establish by rules and regulations, after consultation with the advisory
board, tariff rate approvals and modifications, licensing standards, enforcement policy, and safety
regulations.
(b) No tariff rate, rule, or regulation shall be adopted pursuant to this chapter by the DPUC
without consultation with the advisory board.
(c) All actions taken pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to the provisions of chapter
35 of title 42 ("administrative procedures").
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.
========
LC006121
========
LC006121 - Page 3 of 4